zh-TW: 牙線形式: 牙線棒; 牙線補充包; 齒間刷; 電動牙線機刷頭; 線軸; 細繩; 其他
de: Zahnseideformat: Zahnseidestick; Zahnseide-Nachfüllung; Interdentalbürste; Elektrischer Zahnseidereiniger-Kopf; Spule; String; Sonstiges
pl: Format nici dentystycznej: Wykałaczka z nicią; Wkład nici; Szczoteczka międzyzębowa; Końcówka elektrycznego irygatora; Szpula; Sznurek; Inne
pt-BR: Formato do fio dental: Palito com fio dental; Refil de fio dental; Escova interdental; Cabeça de fio dental elétrico; Carretel; Corda; Outro
nb: Tanntrådformat: Tanntrådholder; Tanntråd refill; Interdentalbørste; Elektrisk tanntrådhode; Spole; Snor; Annet
sv: Tandtrådsformat: Tandtrådspinne; Tandtrådsrefill; Mellanrumsborste; Elektriskt tandtrådshuvud; Rulle; Sträng; Övrigt
ja: デンタルフロスフォーマット: フロスピック; フロスリフィル; 歯間ブラシ; 電動フロッサーヘッド; スプール; ストリング; その他
fi: Hammaslangan muoto: Lankatikku; Lankatäyttö; Hammasväliharja; Sähköisen lankalaitteiden pää; Kela; Nauha; Muu
hr-HR: Format zubnog konca: Čačkalica s koncem; Punjenje konca; Interdentalna četkica; Glava električnog konca; Kolut; Niz; Ostalo
fr: Format du fil dentaire: Porte-fil dentaire; Recharge de fil dentaire; Brossette interdentaire; Tête de jet dentaire électrique; Bobine; Ficelle; Autre
ro-RO: Format ață dentară: Bețișor cu ață dentară; Rezervă ață dentară; Periuță interdentală; Cap pentru aparat cu jet de apă; Rolă; În serie; Altele
nl: Tandflosformaat: Floss pick; Floss navulling; Interdentale borstel; Elektrische flosser kop; Spoel; Snaar; Andere
cs: Formát zubní nitě: Párátko s nití; Náhradní náplň niti; Mezizubní kartáček; Hlavice elektrického flosstřiku; Cívka; Řetízek; Jiné
es: Formato del hilo dental: Palillo con hilo dental; Recarga de hilo dental; Cepillo interdental; Cabezal de hilo dental eléctrico; Carrete; Cordón; Otros
zh-CN: 牙线形式: 牙线棒; 牙线替换装; 齿间刷; 电动冲牙器头; 线轴; 细绳; 其他
el: Μορφή οδοντικού νήματος: Οδοντογλυφίδα με νήμα; Ανταλλακτικό νήμα; Μεσοδόντιο βουρτσάκι; Κεφαλή ηλεκτρικού νήματος; Καρούλι; String; Άλλο
hu: Fogselyemformátum: Fogpiszkáló selyemmel; Fogselyem utántöltő; Interdentális kefe; Elektromos fogselyem fej; Orsó; Sor; Egyéb
en: Dental floss format: Floss pick; Floss refill; Interdental brush; Power flosser head; Spool; String; Other
th: รูปแบบไหมขัดฟัน: ไม้จิ้มฟันมีไหม; ไหมขัดฟันแบบรีฟิล; แปรงซอกฟัน; หัวเครื่องขัดไหมขัดฟัน; ม้วน; สตริง; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Dantų siūlo formatas: Dantų siūlo krapštukas; Dantų siūlo papildymas; Tarpdančių šepetėlis; Elektrinio dantų siūlo galvutė; Ritė; Styginis; Kita
ko: 치실 형식: 치실픽; 치실 리필; 치간 칫솔; 전동 치실 헤드; 스풀; 끈; 기타
pt-PT: Formato do fio dentário: Palito com fio dentário; Recarga de fio dentário; Escova interdentária; Cabeça de irrigador elétrico; Rolo; Corda; Outro
ru: Формат зубной нити: Флосс-палочка; Сменный блок флосса; Интердентальная щетка; Насадка для электрического флоссера; Катушка; Струна; Другой
bg-BG: Форма на конеца за зъби: Клечка с конец; Резервен конец; Интердентална четка; Глава за електрически конец; Ролка; Низ; Други
sl-SI: Format zobne nitke: Zobotrebec z nitko; Polnilo za nitko; Medzobna ščetka; Glava električnega čistilca; Tuljava; Niz; Drugo
sk-SK: Formát dentálnej nite: Špáradlo s niťou; Náplň nite; Medzizubná kefka; Hlavica elektrického čističa; Cievka; Reťazec; Iné
da: Tandtrådsformat: Tandstikker med tråd; Tandtrådsrefill; Interdental børste; Elektrisk tandtrådshoved; Rulle; String; Andet
tr: Diş ipi formatı: Diş ipi çubuğu; Diş ipi yedek; Diş arası fırçası; Elektrikli diş ipi başlığı; Makara; Yay; Diğer
it: Formato del filo interdentale: Archetto interdentale; Ricarica filo interdentale; Spazzolino interdentale; Testina idropulsore; Rocchetto; Corda; Altro
vi: Định dạng chỉ nha khoa: Tăm chỉ; Lõi thay thế; Bàn chải kẽ răng; Đầu máy xỉa răng; Cuộn; Chuỗi; Khác